Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB94.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "income" in section 1303 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, is amended to read:Section 1303. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Income." All income from whatever source derived, 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 including, but not limited to:(1) Salaries, wages, bonuses, commissions, income from self-employment, alimony, support money, cash public assistance and relief.(2) The gross amount of any pensions or annuities, including railroad retirement benefits for calendar years prior to 1999 and 50% of railroad retirement benefits for calendar years 1999 and thereafter. For a person who receives a payment from a qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.) and deposits all or a portion of the payment in another qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 within 60 days after receipt of the payment, the amount deposited shall be excluded from income.(3) (i) All benefits received under the Social Security Act (49 Stat. 620, 42 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.), except Medicare benefits, for calendar years prior to 1999, and 50% of all benefits received under the Social Security Act, except Medicare benefits, for calendar years 1999 and thereafter.(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act to the contrary, persons who, as of December 31, 2012, are eligible for the property tax or rent rebate shall remain eligible if the household income limit is exceeded due solely to a Social Security cost-of-living adjustment.(iii) Eligibility in the property tax and rent rebate program pursuant to subparagraph (ii) shall expire on December 31, 2016.(4) All benefits received under State unemployment 20250SB0094PN0049 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 insurance laws.(5) All interest received from the Federal or any state government or any instrumentality or political subdivision thereof.(6) Realized capital gains and rentals.(7) Workers' compensation.(8) The gross amount of loss of time insurance benefits, life insurance benefits and proceeds, except the first $5,000 of the total of death benefit payments.(9) Gifts of cash or property, other than transfers by gift between members of a household, in excess of a total value of $300.The term does not include surplus food or other relief in kind supplied by a governmental agency, property tax or rent rebate, inflation dividend, Federal veterans' disability payments or State veterans' benefits.* * *Section 2. The amendment of the definition of "income" in section 1303 of the act shall apply to calendar years beginning after December 31, 2026.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0094PN0049 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021